Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1183.
people of the state of michigan enact: PART 344 RIPARIAN STRUCTURES Sec. 34401. As used in this part: (a) "Commercial or industrial riparian structure" means a dock, wharf, pier, jetty, or seawall that meets both of the following criteria: (i) Is used for, or protects riparian property that is used for, commercial or industrial purposes. (ii) Is not a high-risk riparian structure. (b) "High-risk riparian structure" means a structure located on riparian property that is classified as high-risk under section 34303(2) and that substantially contributes to that riparian property's high-risk classification. (c) "Owner of a riparian structure" or "owner" means a person that owns, leases, controls, operates, maintains, or manages the riparian structure. (d) "Riparian structure" means any of the following: (i) A high-risk riparian structure. (ii) A commercial or industrial riparian structure. (e) "Waters of the state" means that term as defined in section 3101. Sec. 34405. (1) The owner of a riparian structure shall submit to the department and the municipality where the riparian structure is located reports on inspections of the riparian structure. The inspections must be conducted, and the reports prepared, by an environmental consultant who is a licensed professional engineer. An inspection report must be submitted in accordance with the schedule established under subsection (2) as follows: (a) Not less than once every 3 years for a high-risk riparian structure. (b) Not less than once every 5 years for a commercial or industrial riparian structure. (2) The department shall establish an inspection schedule for riparian structures. The schedule must begin on January 1, 2028, and require submission of inspection reports for approximately 1/3 of all high-risk riparian structures and 1/5 of all commercial or industrial riparian structures each year. The department shall notify owners of riparian structures in writing when inspection reports are due. (3) The department may require additional inspection reports following an event or change in conditions that could threaten a riparian structure. (4) An inspection report required by this section must include, at a minimum, all of the following: (a) An evaluation of the riparian structure's structural integrity, taking into consideration reasonably foreseeable water levels. (b) A determination of whether deficiencies exist that could lead to the failure of the riparian structure, including, but not limited to, the failure to prevent the release of any substance that may cause pollution of the waters of the state, if the riparian structure is designed for that purpose. (c) Recommendations for maintenance, repair, and modifications of the riparian structure that are necessary to eliminate any deficiencies. (5) If an inspection report under subsection (1) or (3) discloses the need, the department may require the submission of a report on a more detailed investigation or evaluation of a particular feature of a riparian structure. An environmental consultant who is a licensed professional engineer shall conduct the inspection and prepare the report. (6) If the owner of a riparian structure does not submit a report as required by subsection (1), (3), or (5), the department may arrange to have an inspection, investigation, or evaluation conducted and a report prepared. The department shall provide a copy of the report to the owner of the riparian structure and the municipality where the riparian structure is located. (7) All inspections, investigations, and evaluations required by this section must be conducted and all reports required by this section must be prepared and submitted at the expense of the owner of the riparian structure. The department may recover costs incurred under subsection (6) in a civil action. (8) The owner of a riparian structure shall promptly correct a deficiency in the riparian structure identified in a report prepared under this section. Sec. 34407. If the department determines that a person is in violation of this part or a rule promulgated under this part, the department may issue an order that requires the person to comply with this part or the rule. The order must state the nature of the violation, the required compliance action, and a time for compliance that the department determines is reasonable, taking into account the seriousness of the violation and the nature of any threat to public health, safety, welfare, property, or natural resources, or the public trust in those natural resources, that may be involved. Sec. 34409. (1) If the department determines that a person is in violation of this part or a rule promulgated or order issued under this part, on request of the department, the attorney general may commence a civil action for appropriate relief, including injunctive relief. (2) A civil action under this section may be brought in the circuit court for Ingham County or for the county in which the riparian structure is located. (3) In addition to any other relief granted under this section, the court shall impose a civil fine of not less than $2,500.00 or more than $5,000.00 for each day of violation of this part or a rule promulgated or order issued under this part. A fine collected under this subsection must be deposited in the Great Lakes and rivers protection fund created in section 3115. Sec. 34411. The department may promulgate rules in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, as necessary, to implement and enforce this part. Sec. 34413. This part does not relieve an owner of any legal duty, obligation, or liability incident to the ownership or operation of a riparian structure. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 1182. (b) Senate Bill No. 1184.